Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0325

Social card games, punchboards, pull-tabs authorized.

The legislature hereby authorizes any person, association or organization operating an established business primarily engaged in the selling of food or drink for consumption on the premises to conduct social card games and to utilize punchboards and pull-tabs as a commercial stimulant to such business when licensed and utilized or operated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

[ 1987 c 4 s 29. Formerly RCW 9.46.030(4).]